Florida, session 2026, HB975.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
Page 1 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
26
27 Section 1. Subsection (1) of section 272.09, Florida
28 Statutes, is amended to read:
29 272.09 Management, maintenance, and upkeep of Capitol
30 Center.—
31 (1) For purposes of this section, the term "Capitol
32 Complex" means the portion of the Capitol Center commonly
33 referred to as the Capitol, the Historic Capitol, the Senate
34 Office Building, the House Office Building, the Knott Building,
35 the Pepper Building, the Holland Building, the Elliot Building,
36 the R.A. Gray Building, and the associated parking garages and
37 curtilage of each, including the state-owned lands and public
38 streets adjacent thereto within an area bounded by and including
39 Calhoun Street, East Pensacola Street, Monroe Street, East Park
40 Avenue, West Park Avenue Jefferson Street, West Pensacola
41 Street, Martin Luther King Jr. Boulevard, and Gaines Street. The
42 term does not include the Supreme Court Building or the public
43 streets adjacent thereto. The portion of the Capitol Complex
44 existing between and including the Elliot Building and the
45 Holland Building within an area bounded by and including Monroe
46 Street, Gaines Street, Calhoun Street, and East Pensacola Street
47 shall be known as "Memorial Park."
48 Section 2. Subsections (3) and (4) are added to section
49 272.12, Florida Statutes, to read:
50 272.12 Florida Capitol Center Planning District.—
Page 2 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
51 (3) The Department of Management Services is responsible
52 for the aesthetics of the Capitol Center for visitors.
53 (4) The Department of Management Services may close any
54 street within or adjoining the Capitol Complex with the consent
55 of the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of
56 the House of Representatives.
57 Section 3. Paragraph (e) is added to subsection (1) of
58 section 272.121, Florida Statutes, to read:
59 272.121 Capitol Center long-range planning.—
60 (1) The Department of Management Services shall develop a
61 comprehensive and long-range plan for the development of state-
62 owned property within the Capitol Center. In developing this
63 plan, the department shall consider:
64 (e) The security of the Capitol Center and surrounding
65 areas and the need to keep the Capitol Center and surrounding
66 areas safe for visitors.
67 Section 4. Subsection (4) of section 272.16, Florida
68 Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (5) and amended, and a new
69 subsection (4) is added to that section, to read:
70 272.16 Parking areas within Capitol Center area.—
71 (4) The Department of Management Services, in consultation
72 with the Capitol Police, shall establish enhanced security
73 measures to protect members of the Legislature, state officers,
74 employees, and visitors in such parking areas.
75 (5)(4) The Department of Management Services shall adopt
Page 3 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
76 such rules as are necessary to implement this section carry out
77 the purposes of subsections (1) and (3).
78 Section 5. Section 943.60, Florida Statutes, is amended to
79 read:
80 943.60 Definitions.—For the purposes of ss. 943.60-943.68,
81 the term "Capitol Complex" means that portion of Tallahassee,
82 Leon County, Florida, commonly referred to as the Capitol, the
83 Historic Capitol, the Senate Office Building, the House Office
84 Building, the Knott Building, the Pepper Building, the Holland
85 Building, the Elliot Building, the R.A. Gray Building, and the
86 associated parking garages and curtilage of each, including the
87 state-owned lands and public streets adjacent thereto within an
88 area bounded by and including Calhoun Street, East Pensacola
89 Street, Monroe Street, East Park Avenue, West Park Avenue
90 Jefferson Street, West Pensacola Street, Martin Luther King Jr.
91 Boulevard, and Gaines Street. The term includes the State
92 Capital Circle Office Complex located in Leon County, Florida.
93 The term does not include the Supreme Court Building or the
94 public streets adjacent thereto. The portion of the Capitol
95 Complex existing between and including the Elliot Building and
96 the Holland Building within an area bounded by and including
97 Monroe Street, Gaines Street, Calhoun Street, and East Pensacola
98 Street shall be known as "Memorial Park."
99 Section 6. Section 943.61, Florida Statutes, is amended to
100 read:
Page 4 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
101 943.61 Powers and duties of the Capitol Police.—
102 (1) There is created the Capitol Police within the
103 Department of Law Enforcement, to serve the safety and security
104 needs of both the legislative and executive branches of state
105 government. It is the intent of the Legislature that the Capitol
106 Police serve as a specially trained and highly effective
107 security and law enforcement agency serving the Capitol Complex
108 and the state. It shall be the primary responsibility of the
109 Capitol Police to protect the security of the Governor, the
110 Lieutenant Governor, the members of the Cabinet, and the members
111 of the Senate and of the House of Representatives, and those
112 employees assigned to assist such state officials in the
113 performance of their official duties, and to ensure their access
114 to buildings and premises within the Capitol Complex, thereby
115 providing for the continuous operation of the government of the
116 State of Florida. It shall also be the responsibility of the
117 Capitol Police to ensure that the Capitol Complex and
118 surrounding areas are safe for members of the Senate and of the
119 House of Representatives and those employees assigned to assist
120 such state officials in the performance of their official
121 duties.
122 (2) The Capitol Police shall also provide security and
123 protection for other state officials, employees, and visitors to
124 the Capitol Complex and shall maintain a reasonable degree of
125 safety and security within the Capitol Complex and surrounding
Page 5 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
126 areas while ensuring reasonable access to buildings and premises
127 within the Capitol Complex by state officials, employees, and
128 visitors. The Capitol Police shall also ensure that adequate
129 signs and personnel are in place to inform and assist the
130 occupants of and visitors to buildings within the Capitol
131 Complex.
132 (3) Nothing herein limits the ability of the Capitol
133 Police to provide mutual aid to other law enforcement agencies
134 as authorized by law unless such a limitation is expressly
135 included in the operational security plans provided for herein.
136 (4) The Capitol Police shall have the following
137 responsibilities, powers, and duties:
138 (a) To develop, in consultation with the Governor, Cabinet
139 officers, the President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the
140 House of Representatives, written operational plans for basic
141 and enhanced security measures and actions related to the
142 Capitol Complex. Such plans shall address crime and vagrancy in
143 the streets surrounding the Capitol Complex. Such plans and any
144 changes or amendments thereto may shall not be implemented
145 unless presented in writing in final form to the Governor, the
146 President of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
147 Representatives and all three grant their approval in writing.
148 The approval of any officer required herein shall expire 60 days
149 after such officer vacates his or her office, and the written
150 approval of the successor in office must be obtained before
Page 6 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
151 prior to the continuation of operations under such plans. Upon
152 the request of the Governor, a Cabinet officer, the President of
153 the Senate, or the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the
154 Capitol Police shall activate previously approved enhanced
155 security measures and actions in accordance with the approved
156 operational plans specific to the requesting officer's
157 responsibilities and to the facilities occupied by such officer
158 and employees responsible to such officer. Upon an emergency
159 threatening the immediate safety and security of occupants of
160 the Capitol Complex, so declared by the Governor, plans not
161 approved as required by this paragraph may be implemented for a
162 period not to exceed 15 days, provided such plans do not
163 substantially interfere with the ability of the Senate and the
164 House of Representatives to assemble for any constitutional
165 purpose.
166 (b) To provide and maintain the security of all property
167 located in the Capitol Complex in a manner consistent with the
168 security plans developed and approved under paragraph (a) and,
169 in consultation with the State Fire Marshal, to provide for
170 evacuations, information, and training required for firesafety
171 on such property in a manner consistent with s. 633.218.
172 (c) To develop plans for reporting incidents involving
173 buildings and property within the Capitol Complex, emergency
174 procedures and evacuation routes in the event of fire, security
175 threats, incidents prompting a need for evacuation, acts of
Page 7 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
176 terrorism, or natural or manmade disaster and to make such
177 procedures and routes known to those persons occupying such
178 buildings.
179 (d) To employ officers who hold certification as law
180 enforcement officers in accordance with the minimum standards
181 and qualifications as set forth in s. 943.13 and the provisions
182 of chapter 110, and who have the authority to bear arms, make
183 arrests, except as may be limited in the security plans
184 established under paragraph (a), and apply for arrest warrants.
185 (e) To hire guards and administrative, clerical,
186 technical, and other personnel as may be required.
187 (f) To train all officers and other employees in fire
188 prevention, firesafety, emergency medical procedures, and
189 preventing and responding to acts of terrorism.
190 (g) To respond to all complaints relating to criminal
191 activity or security threats within the Capitol Complex, or
192 against the Governor, the Lieutenant Governor, a member of the
193 Cabinet, a member of the Senate or of the House of
194 Representatives, or an employee assisting such official.
195 (h) As provided by the security plans developed and
196 approved under paragraph (a), upon request of the presiding
197 officer of either house of the Legislature, the director may
198 assign one or more officers for the protection of a member of
199 the house served by such presiding officer. Per diem and
200 subsistence allowance for department employees traveling with a
Page 8 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
201 member of the Legislature away from Tallahassee shall be
202 computed by payment of a sum up to the amounts permitted in s.
203 112.061 for meals, plus actual expenses for lodging to be
204 substantiated by paid bills therefor.
205 (i) To enforce rules of the Department of Management
206 Services governing the regulation of traffic and parking within
207 the Capitol Complex and to impound illegally or wrongfully
208 parked vehicles.
209 (j) To establish policies for the organizational
210 structure, principles of command, and internal operations of the
211 Capitol Police, provided that such policies are not inconsistent
212 with the provisions of ss. 943.61-943.68 or the security plans
213 developed and approved under paragraph (a).
214 (k) To carry out the transportation and protective
215 services functions described in s. 943.68.
216 (l) To provide to the Legislature a report with
217 recommendations to enhance the safety of areas surrounding the
218 Capitol Complex.
219 (5) Officers of the Capitol Police may make lawful
220 arrests, consistent with the purposes, responsibilities, and
221 limitations set forth in ss. 943.60-943.68. However, except with
222 the prior approval of the appropriate presiding officer,
223 officers of the Capitol Police shall have no power to prevent
224 the convening or continuation of any meeting of the Legislature,
225 legislative committees, or staff, nor shall they have the power
Page 9 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
226 to interfere with the legislative duties or rights of a member
227 of the Legislature, or to interfere with the constitutional
228 duties or rights of the Governor or a member of the Cabinet,
229 except as may be necessary to protect the health and safety of
230 any person from a clear and present danger, or as may be
231 otherwise provided in the security plans developed and approved
232 for fire prevention, firesafety, and emergency medical
233 procedures under paragraph (4)(a). No employee of the Capitol
234 Police shall be permitted in either legislative chamber without
235 the specific permission of the presiding officer of that house
236 of the Legislature, but may enter in the case of an emergency
237 when the presiding officer is not able or available to consent.
238 Section 7. Section 943.64, Florida Statutes, is amended to
239 read:
240 943.64 Ex officio agents.—Law enforcement officers of the
241 Department of Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles, special agents
242 or inspectors of the Department of Law Enforcement, and law
243 enforcement officers of other state agencies, counties, and
244 municipalities are ex officio agents of the Capitol Police, and
245 may, when authorized by the executive director of the department
246 or the executive director's designee, enforce rules and laws
247 applicable to the powers and duties of the Capitol Police to
248 provide and maintain the security required by ss. 943.61-943.68,
249 including patrolling the Capitol Complex and surrounding areas.
250 Section 8. Six full-time equivalent positions, for five
Page 10 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 975 2026
251 officers and one sergeant, are authorized to establish an
252 outreach policing community group within the Capitol Police.
253 Section 9. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 11 of 11
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb975-00